Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202060-1910
Rules and regulations.

The Director of Motor Vehicles shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations providing for such forms and procedures as are necessary or desirable to effectuate the provisions of sections 60-1901 to 60-1911. Such rules and regulations may include procedures for the removal and disposition of vehicle identification numbers of abandoned vehicles, forms for local records for abandoned vehicles, and inquiries relating to ownership of such vehicles.

Laws 1971, LB 295, § 10;

Laws 1999, LB 90, § 11;

Laws 2018, LB275, § 5.